Washington statutes.
RCW 35.22.205

Compensation and hours of mayor and elected officials.

The compensation and the time to be devoted to the performance of the duties of the mayor and elected officials of all cities of the first class shall be as fixed by ordinance of said city irrespective of any city charter provisions.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.22.205. Prior: 1957 c 113 s 1; 1955 c 354 s 1.]